South Dakota, session 2026, SB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 38-10-34 be AMENDED:
38-10-34. Any Except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this Act, any person,
firm, or corporation subject to the fee provided in this chapter that objects to the collection
of the fee may, within sixty days following the collection, apply to the wheat commission
for a refund of the fee. Upon the return of the refund application, accompanied by a true,
legible record of the invoices delivered by the purchaser to the grower, the commission
shall, within thirty days, refund the net amount of the fee collected to the grower. If no
request for refund has been made within sixty days after the collection of the fee, the
grower shall be is conclusively presumed to have agreed to the deduction.
The commission shall make the refund application available online and provide for
the electronic submission of the application and all required documentation.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-10:
The commission shall develop and implement an alternative refund process by
which a grower may, before December thirty-first, file with the commission a single
electronic request for an automatic refund of all assessments imposed upon and paid by
the grower in accordance with this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. The
commission shall provide for the electronic submission of all documentation necessary to
obtain the refund.
Section 3. That § 38-27-16 be AMENDED:
38-27-16. Any Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this Act, any grower
subject to the assessment provided in this chapter, within sixty days following the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.120.24 2 189
assessment, may make application to the oilseeds council for a refund of the assessment.
Upon return of the refund application accompanied by a record of the assessment by the
first purchaser, the grower shall, within sixty days, be refunded the net amount of the
assessment collected. However, a grower, for any reason, having paid the assessment
more than once on the same sunflowers, safflowers, canola, or flax, upon furnishing proof
of this to the council, is entitled to a refund of the overpayment.
The council shall make the refund application available online and provide for the
electronic submission of the application and all required documentation.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-27:
The council shall develop and implement an alternative refund process by which a
grower may, before December thirty-first, file with the council a single electronic request
for an automatic refund of all assessments imposed upon and paid by the grower in
accordance with this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. The council shall provide
for the electronic submission of all documentation necessary to obtain the refund.
Section 5. That § 38-32-20 be AMENDED:
38-32-20. Any Except as otherwise provided in section 6 of this Act, any grower
subject to the assessment provided in this chapter may, within sixty days following such
assessment, make application to the council for a refund of the assessment. Upon the
return of the refund application, accompanied by a record of the assessment by the first
purchaser, the grower shall, within sixty days, be refunded the net amount of the
assessment collected. However, a grower who has paid the assessment more than once
on the same corn is entitled to a refund of the overpayment.
The council shall make the refund application available online and provide for the
electronic submission of the application and all required documentation.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-32:
The council shall develop and implement an alternative refund process by which a
grower may, before December thirty-first, file with the council a single electronic request
for an automatic refund of all assessments imposed upon and paid by the grower in
accordance with this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. The council shall provide
for the electronic submission of all documentation necessary to obtain the refund.
Section 7. That § 38-33-10 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.120.24 3 189
38-33-10. Within ninety days following the assessment, Except as otherwise
provided in section 8 of this Act, any seller subject to the assessment provided in §§ 38-
33-1 to 38-33-12, inclusive, may, within sixty days following the assessment, apply to the
commission for a refund of the assessment. The refund application shall must be
accompanied by a copy of the record of the assessment on the sale. The commission shall
refund the amount of the assessment collected within sixty days of receiving a valid refund
application.
The commission shall make the refund application available online and provide for
the electronic submission of the application and all required documentation.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-33:
The commission shall develop and implement an alternative refund process by
which a seller may, before December thirty-first, file with the commission a single
electronic request for an automatic refund of all assessments imposed upon and paid by
the seller in accordance with this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. The
commission shall provide for the electronic submission of all documentation necessary to
obtain the refund.
Section 9. That § 38-34-18 be AMENDED:
38-34-18. Any Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this Act, any grower
subject to the assessment provided in this chapter, within sixty days following the
assessment, may apply to the council for a refund of the assessment. Upon return of the
refund application accompanied by a record of the assessment by the first purchaser, the
grower shall, within sixty days, be refunded the net amount of the assessment collected.
Additionally, a grower, who for any reason, pays the assessment more than once on the
same pulse crops, upon furnishing proof of this to the council, is entitled to a refund of
the overpayment.
The council shall make the refund application available online and provide for the
electronic submission of the application and all required documentation.

Section 10. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-34:
The council shall develop and implement an alternative refund process by which a
grower may, before December thirty-first, file with the council a single electronic request
for an automatic refund of all assessments imposed upon and paid by the grower in
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.120.24 4 189
accordance with this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. The council shall provide
for the electronic submission of all documentation necessary to obtain the refund.
Section 11. That § 40-31-17 be AMENDED:
40-31-17. Any producer desiring a refund of an assessment paid under this
chapter must himself make written shall file an application to with the secretary of the
American Dairy Association of South Dakota therefor. Such application may only be made
on an annual basis and may only be made within thirty days after July first, of each year
on forms provided by the association. Upon receipt of such completed refund application
upon such forms, the association. The application must be filed on or before September
first for the period beginning July first of the previous year through June thirtieth of the
year of filing.
The secretary of the association shall, within thirty sixty days of receiving the
application, approve the voucher for payment of the net refund due such the producer and
transmit such the voucher to the state auditor. The association shall make the application
available in printed form upon request and electronically online.
The association shall provide for the electronic submission of the application and
all required documentation.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.